California, session 20252026, SB467.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 101.20 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:101.20. (a) The Memorial Highway Signage Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.(b) All moneys in the fund, including state General Fund appropriations, public or private bequeaths, donations, gifts, or grants, and any federal funds, shall be available, upon an appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for the department’s costs in erecting signage for memorial highway designations previously approved by the Legislature that memorialize individuals who have promoted racial and gender equity.